Washington statutes.
RCW 7.68.240

Payment if no actions pending.

Upon a showing by any convicted person or the state that five years have elapsed from the establishment of such escrow account and further that no actions are pending against such convicted person pursuant to RCW 7.68.200 through 7.68.280, the department shall immediately pay over 50 percent of any moneys in the escrow account to such person or his or her legal representatives and 50 percent of any moneys in the escrow account to the fund under RCW 7.68.035(6).

[ 2023 c 449 s 6; 2022 c 260 s 22; 2011 c 336 s 249; 1988 c 155 s 4; 1979 ex.s. c 219 s 16.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2023 c 449: See note following RCW 13.40.058.

Construction—Effective date—2022 c 260: See notes following RCW 3.66.120.

Severability—1979 ex.s. c 219: See note following RCW 70.125.010.